Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1503
Property subject to levy and sale.

Lands, tenements, goods and chattels, not exempt by law, shall be subject to the payment of debts, and shall be liable to be taken on execution and sold as hereinafter provided.

R.S.1867, Code § 476, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 8044;

C.S.1922, § 8985;

C.S.1929, § 20-1503;

R.S.1943, § 25-1503.

Automobile of nonresident defendant could be seized to pay modified judgment for alimony. Miller v. Miller, 153 Neb. 890, 46 N.W.2d 618 (1951).

Attachment affects actual interest of defendant only. Westervelt v. Hagge, 61 Neb. 647, 85 N.W. 852 (1901).

Chattels levied on and replevied cannot be levied on again for claim against said debtor. Beagle v. Smith, 50 Neb. 446, 69 N.W. 956 (1897).